Indiana, session 2026, SB21.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 1-2-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
2 A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
3 1, 2026]:
4 Chapter 18. State Sandwich
5 Sec. 1. The breaded tenderloin sandwich, made from Indiana
6 raised pork, is designated as the official state sandwich of Indiana.
SB 21—LS 6090/DI 150

2
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Commerce and
Technology, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 21, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 21 as introduced.)
BUCHANAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0
SB 21—LS 6090/DI 150